Washington statutes.
RCW 18.43.200

Agreement with department of licensing.

The department of licensing, through an interagency agreement with the board, must provide specified technical services to the board. The initial interagency agreement must be for a term of three years and may be renewed by mutual agreement between the department of licensing and the board.

[ 2020 c 47 s 2; 2019 c 442 s 23.]